ro-RO: Gama de note a armonicii: Alto; Bariton; Bas; Acord; Contrabas; Mixt/set; Sopran; Tenor; Altele
fr: Registre de l’harmonica: Alto; Baryton; Basse; Accord; Contrebasse; Mixte/lot; Soprano; Ténor; Autre
de: Tonumfang der Mundharmonika: Alt; Bariton; Bass; Akkord; Kontrabass; Gemischt/Set; Sopran; Tenor; Sonstige
zh-CN: 口琴音域: 中音; 上低音; 低音; 和弦; 倍低音; 混合/套装; 高音; 次中音; 其他
el: Τονικό εύρος φυσαρμόνικας: Άλτο; Βαρύτονο; Μπάσο; Συγχορδιών; Κοντραμπάσο; Μεικτό/Σετ; Σοπράνο; Τενόρο; Άλλο
lt-LT: Armonikos natų diapazonas: Altas; Baritonas; Bosas; Akordas; Kontrabosas; Mišrus / rinkinys; Sopranas; Tenoras; Kita
nb: Munnspillets noteområde: Alt; Baryton; Bass; Akkord; Kontrabass; Blandet / sett; Sopran; Tenor; Annet
ko: 하모니카 음역: 알토; 바리톤; 베이스; 코드; 더블 베이스; 혼합/세트; 소프라노; 테너; 기타
bg-BG: Диапазон на нотите на хармониката: Алто; Баритон; Бас; Акордна; Контрабас; Смесен/комплект; Сопрано; Тенор; Друго
sl-SI: Razpon tonov ustne harmonike: Alt; Bariton; Bas; Akord; Kontrabas; Mešano/komplet; Sopran; Tenor; Drugo
tr: Mızıka nota aralığı: Alto; Bariton; Bas; Akor; Kontrbas; Karışık/Set; Soprano; Tenor; Diğer
en: Harmonica note range: Alto; Baritone; Bass; Chord; Double bass; Mixed/Set; Soprano; Tenor; Other
hu: Szájharmonika hangterjedelme: Alt; Bariton; Basszus; Akkord; Nagybőgő; Vegyes / készlet; Szoprán; Tenor; Egyéb
da: Harmonikaens toneomfang: Alt; Baryton; Bas; Akkord; Kontrabas; Blandet/sæt; Sopran; Tenor; Andet
it: Gamma di note dell'armonica: Contralto; Baritono; Basso; Ad accordi; Contrabbasso; Misto/Set; Soprano; Tenore; Altro
zh-TW: 口琴音域: 中音; 上低音; 低音; 和弦; 倍低音; 混合/套組; 高音; 次中音; 其他
nl: Mondharmonica notenbereik: Alt; Bariton; Bas; Akkoord; Contrabas; Gemengd/set; Sopraan; Tenor; Overig
cs: Rozsah not harmoniky: Alt; Baryton; Bas; Akord; Kontrabas; Smíšené / sada; Soprán; Tenor; Jiné
hr-HR: Raspon nota harmonike: Alt; Bariton; Bas; Akord; Kontrabas; Mješovito / komplet; Sopran; Tenor; Ostalo
sv: Munspelets tonomfång: Alt; Baryton; Bas; Ackord; Kontrabas; Blandat/set; Sopran; Tenor; Övrigt
vi: Phạm vi nốt nhạc của kèn harmonica: Alto; Baritone; Bass; Hợp âm; Double bass; Hỗn hợp/Bộ; Soprano; Tenor; Khác
es: Rango de notas de la armónica: Alto; Barítono; Bajo; Acorde; Contrabajo; Mixto/Set; Soprano; Tenor; Otro
ja: ハーモニカの音域: アルト; バリトン; バス; コード; ダブルベース; ミックス/セット; ソプラノ; テナー; その他
pl: Zakres dźwięków harmonijki: Alt; Baryton; Bas; Akord; Kontrabas; Mieszane/Zestaw; Sopran; Tenor; Inny
pt-BR: Extensão das notas da gaita: Contralto; Barítono; Baixo; Acorde; Contrabaixo; Misto/Conjunto; Soprano; Tenor; Outro
th: ช่วงเสียงของฮาร์โมนิกา: อัลโต; แบริโทน; เบส; คอร์ด; ดับเบิลเบส; ผสม/ชุด; โซปราโน; เทเนอร์; อื่นๆ
ru: Диапазон звучания губной гармоники: Альт; Баритон; Бас; Аккордовая; Контрабас; Смешанный/набор; Сопрано; Тенор; Другое
sk-SK: Tónový rozsah harmoniky: Alt; Barytón; Bas; Akord; Dvojitý bas; Zmiešané/súprava; Soprán; Tenor; Iné
pt-PT: extensão das notas da gaita: Alto; Barítono; Baixo; Acorde; Contrabaixo; Misto/conjunto; Soprano; Tenor; Outro
fi: Huuliharpun sointialue: Altto; Baritoni; Basso; Sointu; Kontrabasso; Sekoitettu/setti; Sopraano; Tenori; Muu